Utah statutes.
57-19-16.   Denial, revocation, or suspension of registration of salesperson -- Fine.

(1)  Subject to Section 57-19-17, if the director finds that an applicant or salesperson has engaged in an act described in Subsection (2), the director may:

(a)  deny an application for registration as a salesperson;

(b)  suspend or revoke an existing registration; or

(c)  impose a civil penalty not to exceed $500.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies if the director finds that the applicant or salesperson:

(a)  files, or causes to be filed, with the director a document that contains an untrue or misleading information;

(b)  makes an untrue or misleading statement of material fact;

(c)  fails to state a material fact that is necessary in order to make the statements made not misleading in light of the circumstances under which the statements are made;

(d)  employs a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud, or engages in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon a person;

(e)  subsequent to the effective date of registration as a salesperson, is:

(i)  convicted of:

(A)  a felony; or

(B)  a misdemeanor involving theft, fraud, or dishonesty; or

(ii)  enjoined from, assessed a civil penalty for, or found to have engaged in a violation of any law designed to protect consumers;

(f)  violates this chapter;

(g)  engages in an activity that constitutes dishonest dealing; or

(h)  engages in unprofessional conduct as defined by statute or rule made by the director.



Amended by Chapter 352, 2009 General Session

